Mississippi, session 2026, HB1234.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. Sections 1 through 4 of this act shall be known as the "Mississippi School Accountability Dashboard Act". SECTION 2. The Legislature finds that providing parents, educators and communities with clear, comprehensive and accessible school performance information enhances transparency, fosters accountability and supports student success. Mississippi's performance-based accreditation system offers the foundation for reporting this data. SECTION 3. (1)  (a)  Beginning with the 2026-2027 academic school year, all school districts shall publish their initial School Accountability Dashboards by September 30, 2026.  Subsequently, districts shall provide an updated dashboard within three (3) weeks of receiving their annual district accountability rating as published by the State Department of Education in the Mississippi Succeeds Report Card, and annually thereafter subject to the three-week grace period of publication of the Mississippi Succeeds Report Card. (b)  Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (c), the data required under Section 4 of this act to be reported in the dashboard shall be compiled into an easily accessible, user-friendly single-page graphic and published on the main page of the school district's and in a centralized database on the department's website.  Additional data included on a district's accountability dashboard may consist of measures and statistics the local school board believes to be relevant to the overall performance of schools in that school district, which shall be clearly distinguished from statutorily required reporting metrics. (c)  The department shall be granted a one-year grace period to identify any relevant statistical data that is not currently collected to be subsequently in all dashboard reports beginning with the published dashboards for the 2027-2028 school year. (2)  The State Department of Education shall issue guidance and the standardized dashboard template to all school districts by August 1, 2026.  The department shall develop a School Accountability Dashboard website, that is independent of the department's official website, which shall be administered strictly for the purpose of providing detailed monthly reports of actual revenue, receipts, expenditures and disbursements as further provided in this section.  In the development of School Accountability Dashboard website, the department shall provide an online tool for comparison of public school district budgets and expenditures, in total and on a per-pupil basis. SECTION 4. (1)  The State Department of Education shall develop and provide a standardized template for a School Accountability Dashboard, which shall be aligned with the state's performance-based accreditation system to ensure consistency in reporting by all public schools and districts. (2)  Unless otherwise exempted under Section 3(1)(c) the dashboard shall include, but not be limited to, the following metrics: (a)  Schoolwide Metrics: (i)  School accountability letter grade; (ii)  School district accountability letter grade; (iii)  Graduation rate; (iv)  Grade 8 reading and math proficiency and growth; (v)  Grade 3 reading and math proficiency and growth; (vi) Truancy/absenteeism rate; (vii)  Dropout rate; and (viii)  Student-to-teacher ratio; (b)  College, Career, and Workforce Readiness Metrics: (i)  College placement rate; (ii)  Job placement rate; (iii)  Military placement rate; (iv)  Average ACT and ACT WorkKeys scores; and (v)  Specialty class offerings (e.g., advanced placement, career-technical education, dual credit, industry internships); (vi)  College and career-readiness index scores; (c)  Teacher and Staffing Metrics: (i)  Number of teachers with advanced degrees/certifications; (ii)  Number of teachers with industry experience; (iii)  Teacher turnover rate; and (iv)  Number of long-term substitute teachers utilized; and (d)  School fiscal accounting and expenditure reports. (3)  After the initial submission of school fiscal data in the School Accountability Dashboard by September 30, 2026, required under Section 4(1), beginning October 15, 2026, and the fifteenth day of each month thereafter, each school district shall submit a detailed fiscal accounting report to the State Department of Education, identifying and itemizing every fund allocated, received and expended by the district during the calendar year, before such funds are assigned codes for specific functions and objects.  At a minimum, the school district fiscal accounting report shall include: (a)  The actual amount of total monthly expenditures, which shall be further identified and itemized by: (i)  Amount of each single, independent expenditure; (ii)  Date of specific expenditure; (iii)  The purpose for which the expenditure was made; (iv)  To whom the expenditure of funds was paid; (v)  The function and object code associated with each single, independent expenditure; (vi)  Contracts for each month, including, without limitation, the identity of each vendor, the purpose of each contract and payments associated with each contract; (vii)  An identification of all funding sources, and the monthly beginning and ending balance of those sources; and (viii)  The funding source from which the funds were expended for each transaction; (b)  A reporting of all district staff and personnel expenditures separated as follows: (i)  Total aggregate expenditures for staff and personnel who are compensated according to a statutory salary schedule during the monthly reporting period; (ii)  Total aggregate expenditures for staff and personnel who are not compensated according to a statutory salary schedule during the monthly reporting period; and (iii)  By June 30 of each year, an aggregate accounting of salaries for all district personnel, whether compensated in accordance with a statutory salary schedule, through contractual obligation or regular hourly wages, which further identifies each employee's title or job function, their duties and responsibilities and the aggregate amount of compensation disbursed to each employee during the fiscal year; and (c)  By June 30 of each year, an identification of all supplemental pay provided by the school district, to teachers, teacher assistants and other district personnel, regardless of capacity for which they serve as a full-time or part-time employee. (4)  The State Department of Education, in accordance with rules and regulations established by the State Board of Education, shall withhold a school district's total funding formula allocation for failure of the district to timely report fiscal and personnel data necessary to meet the requirements of this section.  Noncompliance with such rules and regulations shall result in a violation of compulsory accreditation standards as established by the State Board of Education and Commission on School Accreditation. SECTION 5.  Section 37-17-6, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-17-6.  (1)  The State Board of Education, acting through the Commission on School Accreditation, shall establish and implement a permanent performance-based accreditation system, and all noncharter public elementary and secondary schools shall be accredited under this system. (2)  School districts and charter schools shall be required to provide school classroom space that is air-conditioned as a minimum requirement for accreditation. (3)  (a)  The State Board of Education, acting through the Commission on School Accreditation, shall require that school districts employ certified school librarians according to the following formula: Number of Students                Number of Certified Per School Library                School Librarians 0 - 499 Students                  1/2 Full-time Equivalent Certified Librarian 500 or More Students              1 Full-time Certified Librarian (b)  The State Board of Education, however, may increase the number of positions beyond the above requirements. (c)  The assignment of certified school librarians to the particular schools shall be at the discretion of the local school district.  No individual shall be employed as a certified school librarian without appropriate training and certification as a school librarian by the State Department of Education. (d)  School librarians in the district shall spend at least fifty percent (50%) of direct work time in a school library and shall devote no more than one-fourth (1/4) of the workday to administrative activities that are library related. (e)  Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit any school district from employing more certified school librarians than are provided for in this section. (f)  Any additional millage levied to fund school librarians required for accreditation under this subsection shall be included in the tax increase limitation set forth in Sections 37-57-105 and 37-57-107 and shall not be deemed a new program for purposes of the limitation. (4)  [Deleted] (5)  (a) The State Department of Education, acting through the Mississippi Commission on School Accreditation, shall implement a single "A" through "F" school and school district accountability system complying with applicable federal and state requirements in order to reach the following educational goals: (i)  To mobilize resources and supplies to ensure that all students exit third grade reading on grade level; (ii)  To reduce the student dropout rate to ten percent (10%) by 2015; and (iii)  To have sixty percent (60%) of students scoring proficient and advanced on assessments. (b)  The State Department of Education shall combine the state school and school district accountability system with the federal system in order to have a single system. (c)  The State Department of Education shall establish five (5) performance categories ("A," "B," "C," "D" and "F") for the accountability system based on the following criteria: (i)  Student Achievement:  the percent of students proficient and advanced on the current state assessments; (ii)  Individual student growth:  the percent of students making one (1) year's progress in one (1) year's time on the state assessment, with an emphasis on the progress of the lowest twenty-five percent (25%) of students in the school or district; (iii)  Four-year graduation rate:  the percent of students graduating with a standard high school diploma in four (4) years, as defined by federal regulations; (iv)  The system shall include the federally compliant four-year graduation rate in school and school district accountability system calculations.  Graduation rate will apply to high school, charter school and school district accountability ratings as a compensatory component.  The system shall discontinue the use of the High School Completer Index (HSCI); (v)  The school and school district accountability system shall incorporate a standards-based growth model, in order to support improvement of individual student learning; (vi)  The State Department of Education shall determine feeder patterns of schools that do not earn a school grade because the grades and subjects taught at the school do not have statewide standardized assessments needed to calculate a school grade. Upon determination of the feeder pattern, the department shall notify schools and school districts prior to the release of the school grades.  Feeder schools will be assigned the accountability designation of the school to which they provide students; (vii)  Standards for student, school and school district performance will be increased when student proficiency is at a seventy-five percent (75%) and/or when sixty-five percent (65%) of the schools and/or school districts and charter schools are earning a grade of "B" or higher, in order to raise the standard on performance after targets are met; and (viii)  The system shall include student performance on the administration of a career-readiness assessment, such as, but not limited to, the ACT WorkKeys Assessment, deemed appropriate by the State Department of Education working in coordination with the Office of Workforce Development. (d)  The department shall assist the Mississippi Charter School Authorizer Board in the development and implementation of a separate accountability standard to be used in addition to the accountability model established in this section, which shall be used in an evaluative manner to determine the expansion, closure or revocation of an existing charter school.  The department shall establish a procedure under the accountability rating system for the calculation of additional quality points to be awarded to school districts wherein charter schools are located. (6)  Nothing in this section shall be deemed to require a nonpublic school that receives no local, state or federal funds for support to become accredited by the State Board of Education. (7)  The State Board of Education shall create an accreditation audit unit under the Commission on School Accreditation to determine whether schools are complying with accreditation standards. (8)  The State Board of Education shall be specifically authorized and empowered to withhold allocations from the total funding formula funds as provided in Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215 to any public school district or charter school for failure to timely report student, school personnel and fiscal data necessary to meet state and/or federal requirements. (9)  [Deleted] (10)  The State Board of Education shall establish, for those school districts and charter schools failing to meet accreditation standards, a program of development to be complied with in order to receive state funds, except as otherwise provided in subsection (15) of this section when the Governor has declared a state of emergency in a school district or as otherwise provided in Section 206, Mississippi Constitution of 1890.  The state board, in establishing these standards, shall provide for notice to schools and sufficient time and aid to enable schools to attempt to meet these standards, unless procedures under subsection (15) of this section have been invoked. (11)  The State Board of Education shall be charged with the implementation of the program of development in each applicable school district as follows: (a)  Develop an impairment report for each district failing to meet accreditation standards in conjunction with school district officials; (b)  Notify any applicable school district failing to meet accreditation standards that it is on probation until corrective actions are taken or until the deficiencies have been removed.  The local school district shall develop a corrective action plan to improve its deficiencies.  For district academic deficiencies, the corrective action plan for each such school district shall be based upon a complete analysis of the following:  student test data, student grades, student attendance reports, student dropout data, existence and other relevant data. The corrective action plan shall describe the specific measures to be taken by the particular school district and school to improve:  (i) instruction; (ii) curriculum; (iii) professional development; (iv) personnel and classroom organization; (v) student incentives for performance; (vi) process deficiencies; and (vii) reporting to the local school board, parents and the community.  The corrective action plan shall describe the specific individuals responsible for implementing each component of the recommendation and how each will be evaluated.  All corrective action plans shall be provided to the State Board of Education as may be required.  The decision of the State Board of Education establishing the probationary period of time shall be final; (c)  Offer, during the probationary period, technical assistance to the school district in making corrective actions.  Subject to appropriations, the State Department of Education shall provide technical and/or financial assistance to all such school districts in order to implement each measure identified in that district's corrective action plan through professional development and on-site assistance.  Each such school district shall apply for and utilize all available federal funding in order to support its corrective action plan in addition to state funds made available under this paragraph; (d)  Assign department personnel or contract, in its discretion, with the institutions of higher learning or other appropriate private entities with experience in the academic, finance and other operational functions of schools to assist school districts; (e)  Provide for publication of public notice at least one time during the probationary period, in a newspaper published within the jurisdiction of the school district failing to meet accreditation standards, or if no newspaper is published therein, then in a newspaper having a general circulation therein.  The publication shall include the following:  declaration of school system's status as being on probation; all details relating to the impairment report; and other information as the State Board of Education deems appropriate.  Public notices issued under this section shall be subject to Section 13-3-31 and not contrary to other laws regarding newspaper publication. (12)  (a)  If the recommendations for corrective action are not taken by the local school district or if the deficiencies are not removed by the end of the probationary period, the Commission on School Accreditation shall conduct a hearing to allow the affected school district to present evidence or other reasons why its accreditation should not be withdrawn.  Additionally, if the local school district violates accreditation standards that have been determined by the policies and procedures of the State Board of Education to be a basis for withdrawal of school district's accreditation without a probationary period, the Commission on School Accreditation shall conduct a hearing to allow the affected school district to present evidence or other reasons why its accreditation should not be withdrawn.  After its consideration of the results of the hearing, the Commission on School Accreditation shall be authorized, with the approval of the State Board of Education, to withdraw the accreditation of a public school district, and issue a request to the Governor that a state of emergency be declared in that district. (b)  (i)  If the State Board of Education and the Commission on School Accreditation determine that an extreme emergency situation exists in a school district that jeopardizes the safety, security or educational interests of the children enrolled in the schools in that district and that emergency situation is believed to be related to a serious violation or violations of accreditation standards or state or federal law, the State Board of Education may request the Governor to declare a state of emergency in that school district.  For purposes of this paragraph, the declarations of a state of emergency district's impairments are related to a lack of financial may include the school district's serious failure to meet minimum academic standards, as evidenced by a continued pattern of poor student performance, or impairments related to a lack of financial resources. (ii)  If the State Board of Education determines that a public school or district in the state which, during each of two (2) consecutive school years or during two (2) of three (3) consecutive school years, receives an "F" designation by the State Board of Education under the accountability rating system or has been persistently failing as defined by the State Board of Education; or if the State Board of Education determines that a public school or district in the state which, during each of four (4) consecutive school years, receives a "D" or "F" designation by the State Board of Education under the accountability rating system or has been persistently failing as defined by the State Board of Education; or if more than fifty percent (50%) of the schools within a school district are designated as Schools-At-Risk in any one (1) year, then the board may place such school or district into a District of Transformation.  The State Board of Education shall take over only the number of schools and districts for which it has the capacity to serve.  The State Board of Education shall adopt rules and regulations governing any additional requirements for placement into a District of Transformation and the operation thereof.  School districts or schools that are eligible to be placed into a District of Transformation due to poor academic performance but are not absorbed due to the capacity of the State Board of Education, shall develop and implement a district improvement plan with prescriptive guidance and support from the Mississippi Department of Education, with the goal of helping the district improve student achievement.  Failure of the school board, superintendent and school district staff to implement the plan with fidelity and participate in the activities provided as support by the department shall result in the school district retaining its eligibility for placement into a District of Transformation. (iii)  If the State Board of Education determined that a school district is impaired with a serious lack of financial resources, the State Board of Education may place the school district into a District of Transformation.  If a school district is placed into a District of Transformation for financial reasons, the school district shall be required to reimburse the state for any costs incurred by the state on behalf of the school district. (c)  Whenever the Governor declares a state of emergency in a school district in response to a request made under paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection, or when the State Board of Education places a school district into a District of Transformation due to poor academic performance or financial reasons, the State Board of Education may take one or more of the following actions: (i)  Declare a state of emergency, under which some or all of state funds can be escrowed except as otherwise provided in Section 206, Constitution of 1890, until the board determines corrective actions are being taken or the deficiencies have been removed, or that the needs of students warrant the release of funds.  The funds may be released from escrow for any program which the board determines to have been restored to standard even though the state of emergency may not as yet be terminated for the district as a whole; (ii)  Override any decision of the local school board or superintendent of education, or both, concerning the management and operation of the school district, or initiate and make decisions concerning the management and operation of the school district; (iii)  Assign an interim superintendent, or in its discretion, contract with a private entity with experience in the academic, finance and other operational functions of schools and school districts, who will have those powers and duties prescribed in subsection (15) of this section; (iv)  Grant transfers to students who attend this school district so that they may attend other accredited schools or districts in a manner that is not in violation of state or federal law; (v)  For states of emergency declared under paragraph (a) only, if the accreditation deficiencies are related to the fact that the school district is too small, with too few resources, to meet the required standards and if another school district is willing to accept those students, abolish that district and assign that territory to another school district or districts.  If the school district has proposed a voluntary consolidation with another school district or districts, then if the State Board of Education finds that it is in the best interest of the pupils of the district for the consolidation to proceed, the voluntary consolidation shall have priority over any such assignment of territory by the State Board of Education; (vi)  For actions taken pursuant to paragraph (b) only, reduce local supplements paid to school district employees, including, but not limited to, instructional personnel, assistant teachers and extracurricular activities personnel, if the district's impairment is related to a lack of financial resources, but only to an extent that will result in the salaries being comparable to districts similarly situated, as determined by the State Board of Education; (vii)  For actions taken pursuant to paragraph (b) only, the State Board of Education may take any action as prescribed in Section 37-17-13. (d)  At the time that satisfactory corrective action has been taken in a school district in which a state of emergency has been declared, the State Board of Education may request the Governor to declare that the state of emergency no longer exists in the district. (e)  The parent or legal guardian of a school-age child who is enrolled in a school district whose accreditation has been withdrawn by the Commission on School Accreditation and without approval of that school district may file a petition in writing to a school district accredited by the Commission on School Accreditation for a legal transfer.  The school district accredited by the Commission on School Accreditation may grant the transfer according to the procedures of Section 37-15-31(1)(b). In the event the accreditation of the student's home district is restored after a transfer has been approved, the student may continue to attend the transferee school district.  The per pupil amount of the total funding formula allotment for the student's home school district shall be transferred monthly to the school district accredited by the Commission on School Accreditation that has granted the transfer of the school-age child. (f)  Upon the declaration of a state of emergency for any school district in which the Governor has previously declared a state of emergency, the State Board of Education may either: (i)  Place the school district into district transformation, in which the school district shall remain until it has fulfilled all conditions related to district transformation.  If the district was assigned an accreditation rating of "D" or "F" when placed into district transformation, the district shall be eligible to return to local control when the school district has attained a "C" rating or higher for three (3) consecutive years; (ii)  Abolish the school district and administratively consolidate the school district with one or more existing school districts; (iii)  Reduce the size of the district and administratively consolidate parts of the district, as determined by the State Board of Education.  However, no school district which is not in district transformation shall be required to accept additional territory over the objection of the district; or (iv)  Require the school district to develop and implement a district improvement plan with prescriptive guidance and support from the State Department of Education, with the goal of helping the district improve student achievement.  Failure of the school board, superintendent and school district staff to implement the plan with fidelity and participate in the activities  provided as support by the department shall result in the school district retaining its eligibility for district transformation. (13)  Upon the declaration of a state of emergency in a school district under subsection (12) of this section, or upon the State Board of Education's placement of a school district into a District of Transformation for academic or financial reasons, the Commission on School Accreditation shall be responsible for public notice at least once a week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper published within the jurisdiction of the school district failing to meet accreditation standards, or if no newspaper is published therein, then in a newspaper having a general circulation therein.  The size of the notice shall be no smaller than one-fourth (1/4) of a standard newspaper page and shall be printed in bold print.  If an interim superintendent has been appointed for the school district, the notice shall begin as follows:  "By authority of Section 37-17-6, * * *Mississippi Code of 1972, as amended, adopted by the Mississippi Legislature during the 1991 Regular Session, this school district (name of school district) is hereby placed under the jurisdiction of the State Department of Education acting through its appointed interim superintendent (name of interim superintendent)." The notice also shall include, in the discretion of the State Board of Education, any or all details relating to the school district's emergency status, including the declaration of a state of emergency in the school district and a description of the district's impairment deficiencies, conditions of any district transformation status and corrective actions recommended and being taken.  Public notices issued under this section shall be subject to Section 13-3-31 and not contrary to other laws regarding newspaper publication. Upon termination of a school district in a District of Transformation, the Commission on School Accreditation shall cause notice to be published in the school district in the same manner provided in this section, to include any or all details relating to the corrective action taken in the school district that resulted in the termination of the state of emergency. (14)  The State Board of Education or the Commission on School Accreditation shall have the authority to require school districts to produce the necessary reports, correspondence, financial statements, and any other documents and information necessary to fulfill the requirements of this section. Nothing in this section shall be construed to grant any individual, corporation, board or interim superintendent the authority to levy taxes except in accordance with presently existing statutory provisions. (15)  (a)  Whenever the Governor declares a state of emergency in a school district in response to a request made under subsection (12) of this section, or when the State Board of Education places a school district into a District of Transformation for academic or financial reasons, the State Board of Education, in its discretion, may assign an interim superintendent to the school district, or in its discretion, may contract with an appropriate private entity with experience in the academic, finance and other operational functions of schools and school districts, who will be responsible for the administration, management and operation of the school district, including, but not limited to, the following activities: (i)  Approving or disapproving all financial obligations of the district, including, but not limited to, the employment, termination, nonrenewal and reassignment of all licensed and nonlicensed personnel, contractual agreements and purchase orders, and approving or disapproving all claim dockets and the issuance of checks; in approving or disapproving employment contracts of superintendents, assistant superintendents or principals, the interim superintendent shall not be required to comply with the time limitations prescribed in Sections 37-9-15 and 37-9-105; (ii)  Supervising the day-to-day activities of the district's staff, including reassigning the duties and responsibilities of personnel in a manner which, in the determination of the interim superintendent, will best suit the needs of the district; (iii)  Reviewing the district's total financial obligations and operations and making recommendations to the district for cost savings, including, but not limited to, reassigning the duties and responsibilities of staff; (iv)  Attending all meetings of the district's school board and administrative staff; (v)  Approving or disapproving all athletic, band and other extracurricular activities and any matters related to those activities; (vi)  Maintaining a detailed account of recommendations made to the district and actions taken in response to those recommendations; (vii)  Reporting periodically to the State Board of Education on the progress or lack of progress being made in the district to improve the district's impairments during the state of emergency; and (viii)  Appointing a parent advisory committee, comprised of parents of students in the school district that may make recommendations to the interim superintendent concerning the administration, management and operation of the school district. The cost of the salary of the interim superintendent and any other actual and necessary costs related to district transformation status paid by the State Department of Education shall be reimbursed by the local school district from funds other than total funding formula funds as provided in Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215.  In the alternative, the local school district may pay the cost of the salary of the interim superintendent.  The department shall submit an itemized statement to the superintendent of the local school district for reimbursement purposes, and any unpaid balance may be withheld from the district's funding formula funds. At the time that the Governor, in accordance with the request of the State Board of Education, declares that the state of emergency no longer exists in a school district, the interim superintendent assigned to the district shall remain in place for a period of two (2) years and shall work alongside the newly reconstituted school board.  A new superintendent may be hired by the newly reconstituted board after the one (1) year state of emergency no longer exists, but he or she shall serve as deputy to the interim superintendent while the interim superintendent is assigned to the district. (b)  In order to provide loans to school districts under a state of emergency or in district transformation status that have impairments related to a lack of financial resources, the School District Emergency Assistance Fund is created as a special fund in the State Treasury into which monies may be transferred or appropriated by the Legislature from any available public education funds. Funds in the School District Emergency Assistance Fund up to a maximum balance of Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) annually shall not lapse but shall be available for expenditure in subsequent years subject to approval of the State Board of Education.  Any amount in the fund in excess of Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) at the end of the fiscal year shall lapse into the State General Fund or the Education Enhancement Fund, depending on the source of the fund. The State Board of Education may loan monies from the School District Emergency Assistance Fund to a school district that is under a state of emergency or in district transformation status, in those amounts, as determined by the board, that are necessary to correct the district's impairments related to a lack of financial resources. The loans shall be evidenced by an agreement between the school district and the State Board of Education and shall be repayable in principal, without necessity of interest, to the School District Emergency Assistance Fund by the school district from any allowable funds that are available.  The total amount loaned to the district shall be due and payable within five (5) years after the impairments related to a lack of financial resources are corrected.  If a school district fails to make payments on the loan in accordance with the terms of the agreement between the district and the State Board of Education, the State Department of Education, in accordance with rules and regulations established by the State Board of Education, may withhold that district's total funding formula funds in an amount and manner that will effectuate repayment consistent with the terms of the agreement; the funds withheld by the department shall be deposited into the School District Emergency Assistance Fund. The State Board of Education shall develop a protocol that will outline the performance standards and requisite timeline deemed necessary for extreme emergency measures.  If the State Board of Education determines that an extreme emergency exists, simultaneous with the powers exercised in this subsection, it shall take immediate action against all parties responsible for the affected school districts having been determined to be in an extreme emergency.  The action shall include, but not be limited to, initiating civil actions to recover funds and criminal actions to account for criminal activity.  Any funds recovered by the State Auditor or the State Board of Education from the surety bonds of school officials or from any civil action brought under this subsection shall be applied toward the repayment of any loan made to a school district hereunder. (16)  [Deleted] (17)  [Deleted] (18)  The State Board of Education, acting through the Commission on School Accreditation, shall require each school district to comply with standards established by the State Department of Audit for the verification of fixed assets and the auditing of fixed assets records as a minimum requirement for accreditation. (19)  [Deleted] (20)  [Deleted] (21)  If a local school district is determined as failing and placed into district transformation status for reasons authorized by the provisions of this section, the interim superintendent appointed to the district shall, within forty-five (45) days after being appointed, present a detailed and structured corrective action plan to move the local school district out of district transformation status to the deputy superintendent.  A copy of the interim superintendent's corrective action plan shall also be filed with the State Board of Education. (22)  The State Board of Education shall integrate the requirements of the School Accountability Dashboard into the existing performance-based accreditation system and ensure compliance by all public schools and districts. SECTION 6.  Section 37-17-8, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-17-8.  (1)  The State Board of Education, through the Commission on School Accreditation, shall establish criteria for comprehensive in-service staff development plans.  These criteria shall:  (a) include, but not be limited to, formula and guidelines for allocating available state funds for in-service training to local school districts; (b) require that a portion of the plans be devoted exclusively for the purpose of providing staff development training for beginning teachers within that local school district and for no other purpose; and (c) require that a portion of the school district's in-service training for administrators and teachers be dedicated to the application and utilization of various disciplinary techniques.  The board shall each year make recommendations to the Legislature concerning the amount of funds which shall be appropriated for this purpose. (2)  School districts shall not be required to submit staff development plans to the Commission on School Accreditation for approval.  However, any school district accredited at the lowest performance levels, as defined by the State Board of Education, shall include, as a part of any required corrective action plan, provisions to address staff development in accordance with State Board of Education requirements.  All school districts, unless specifically exempt from this section, must maintain on file staff development plans as required under this section. The plan shall have been prepared by a district committee appointed by the district superintendent and consisting of teachers, administrators, school board members, and lay people, and it shall have been approved by the district superintendent. (3)  In order to ensure that teachers are not overburdened with paperwork and written reports, local school districts and  the State Board of Education shall take such steps as may be necessary to further the reduction of paperwork requirements on teachers. (4)  Districts meeting the highest levels of accreditation standards, as defined by the State Board of Education, shall be exempted from the mandatory provisions of this section relating to staff development plans. (5)  The School Accountability Dashboard shall serve as a public reporting tool and shall not impose additional punitive measures based solely on the data reported therein. The State Department of Education shall oversee the accuracy and consistency of dashboard data across districts and provide technical assistance as needed. SECTION 7.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.